Florida, session 2026, SB384.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (6) is added to section 337.195, 13 Florida Statutes, to read: 14 337.195âLimits on liability.â 15 (6)âFor purposes of this section, a contractor is 16 considered an agent of the state while acting within the scope 17 of the contract documents. The contract documents must, to the 18 extent permitted by law, provide for the indemnification of the 19 department for any liability, including reasonable attorney 20 fees, incurred up to the limits set forth in this chapter to the 21 extent that such liability is caused by the negligence of the 22 contractor or its employees. 23 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.